Louisiana, session 2026, HB273.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.8 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
DIGEST
The digest printed below was prepared by House Legislative Services. It constitutes no part
of the legislative instrument. The keyword, one-liner, abstract, and digest do not constitute
part of the law or proof or indicia of legislative intent. [R.S. 1:13(B) and 24:177(E)]
HB 273 Engrossed 2026 Regular Session Freiberg
Abstract: Repeals authorization for the distribution of sales and use tax revenue collected
by the governing authority of certain parishes on the sale of admission tickets to
certain events.
Present law authorizes a parish governing authority to pay sales tax revenue derived from
the sale of admission tickets for an event to the promoter of that event if all of the following
conditions are met:
(1) The parish has a population of more than 450,000.
(2) The event was held in a publicly owned facility that has a seating capacity of at least
7,500 or was a multiday event with average daily attendance of at least 7,500.
(3) The parish convention and visitors bureau recommended the payment and the parish
governing authority approved the payment prior to the commencement of ticket
sales.
Proposed law repeals present law.
(Repeals R.S. 33:2740.70.8)
Page 1 of 1